src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ANG_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - chíigang - ENGLISH : # CLASS_ANG_STEM_1

     chíigang+V+Sg+Impv: chíigang
     chíigang+V+Imm+Pres: chíigangga
     chíigang+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: chíigang
     chíigang+V+Simp+Pres: chíiganggang
     chíigang+V+Dir+Past: chíiganggan
     chíigang+V+Rel: chíigangs
     chíigang+V+NonFact: chíigangang
     chíigang+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: chíiganggang
     chíigang+V+Pres+Hab: chíigangganggang
     chíigang+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: chíiganggangang
     chíigang+V+Dir+Past+Hab: chíiganggiinii
     chíigang+V+Interr+Past+Hab: chíiganggaangaa
     chíigang+V+Indir+Past+Hab: chíiganggaangaan
     chíigang+V+Interr+Fut+Long: chíigangäsaa
     chíigang+V+Interr+Fut+Short: chíigangäs
     chíigang+V+Simp+Fut: chíigangäsaang
     chíigang+V+Imm+Fut: chíigangäsga
     chíigang+V+Rel+Fut: chíigangäsaas
     chíigang+V+Fut+NonFact: chíigangäsaa.ang
     chíigang+V+Interr+Near+Fut: chíigangang k̲asaʼáa
     chíigang+V+Near+Fut: chíigangang k̲asaʼáang
     chíigang+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: chíigangang k̲asaasdláa
     chíigang+V+VNear+Fut: chíigangang k̲asaasdláang
     chíigang+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: chíigangʼuuj
     chíigang+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼuujang
     chíigang+V+Res: chíigangäsaaʼuujang
     chíigang+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: chíigangʼus
     chíigang+V+Bias+Interr+Past: chíigangʼujaa
     chíigang+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: chíigangʼuujaangaa
     chíigang+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: chíigangäsaaʼus
     chíigang+V+Cert+Fut: chíigangäsaaʼahlans
     chíigang+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: chíigangäseehl
     chíigang+V+Pl+Impv: chíigangʼuu
     chíigang+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: chíigangʼwaa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼwaa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼwaang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Dir+Past: chíigangʼwägan
     chíigang+V+3pl+Interr+Past: chíigangʼaawaa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Indir+Past: chíigangʼaawaan
     chíigang+V+3pl+Rel: chíigangʼwaas
     chíigang+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: chíigangʼaawaas
     chíigang+V+3pl+NonFact: chíigangʼwaa.ang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: chíigangʼaawaa.ang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: chíiganggangʼwaa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: chíiganggangʼwaang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: chíiganggangʼwaa.ang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: chíigangʼwägiinii
     chíigang+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: chíigangʼwägaangaa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: chíigangʼwägaangaan
     chíigang+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: chíigangʼwaaäsaa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: chíigangʼwaaäs
     chíigang+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: chíigangʼwaaäsaang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: chíigangʼwaaäsga
     chíigang+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: chíigangʼwaaäsaas
     chíigang+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: chíigangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: chíigangʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Near+Fut: chíigangʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: chíigangʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     chíigang+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: chíigangʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: chíigangʼwaaʼuuj
     chíigang+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼwaaʼuujang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Res: chíigangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: chíigangʼwaaʼus
     chíigang+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: chíigangʼwaaʼujaa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: chíigangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: chíigangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     chíigang+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: chíigangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Cert+Past: chíigangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     chíigang+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: chíigangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     chíigang+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: chíigangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     chíigang+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: chíigangʼwaaʼahlans
     chíigang+V+3pl+Ints+Past: chíigangʼaawaaʼahlang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Cont: chíigangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     chíigang+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: chíigangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     chíigang+V+3pl+Rflx: chíigangʼwaaʼahl
     chíigang+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: chíigangʼwaaäseehl
     chíigang+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: chíigangʼang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: chíigangʼangga
     chíigang+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼanggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Dir+Past: chíigangʼanggan
     chíigang+V+Neg+Interr+Past: chíigangʼaangaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+Indir+Past: chíigangʼaangaan
     chíigang+V+Neg+Rel: chíigangʼans
     chíigang+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: chíigangʼaangaas
     chíigang+V+Neg+NonFact: chíigangʼangang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: chíigangʼaangaa.ang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: chíigangʼanggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: chíiganggangʼanggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: chíiganggangʼangang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: chíigangʼanggiinii
     chíigang+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: chíigangʼanggaangaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: chíigangʼanggaangaan
     chíigang+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: chíigangʼangäsaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: chíigangʼangäs
     chíigang+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: chíigangʼangäsaang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: chíigangʼangäsga
     chíigang+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: chíigangʼangäsaas
     chíigang+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: chíigangʼangäsaa.ang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: chíigangang k̲asaaʼáng
     chíigang+V+Neg+Near+Fut: chíigangang k̲asaaʼánggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: chíigangang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     chíigang+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: chíigangang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: chíigangʼangʼuuj
     chíigang+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼangʼuujang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Res: chíigangʼangäsaaʼuujang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: chíigangʼangʼus
     chíigang+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: chíigangʼangʼujaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: chíigangʼangʼuujaangaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: chíigangʼangäsaaʼus
     chíigang+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: chíigangʼaangʼahlanggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Cert+Past: chíigangʼaangʼahlanggan
     chíigang+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: chíigangʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     chíigang+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: chíigangʼangäsaaʼahlans
     chíigang+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: chíigangʼaangʼahlans
     chíigang+V+Neg+Ints+Past: chíigangʼaangaaʼahlang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Cont: chíigangʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: chíigangʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+Rflx: chíigangʼaangʼahl
     chíigang+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: chíigangʼangäseehl
     chíigang+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: chíigangʼangʼuu
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: chíigangʼangʼwaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼangʼwaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼangʼwaang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: chíigangʼangʼwägan
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: chíigangʼangʼaawaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: chíigangʼangʼaawaan
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: chíigangʼangʼwaas
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: chíigangʼangʼaawaas
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: chíigangʼangʼwaa.ang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: chíigangʼangʼaawaa.ang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: chíiganggangʼangʼwaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: chíiganggangʼangʼwaang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: chíiganggangʼangʼwaa.ang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: chíigangʼangʼwägiinii
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: chíigangʼangʼwägaangaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: chíigangʼangʼwägaangaan
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: chíigangʼangʼwaaäsaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: chíigangʼangʼwaaäs
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: chíigangʼangʼwaaäsaang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: chíigangʼangʼwaaäsga
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: chíigangʼangʼwaaäsaas
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: chíigangʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: chíigangʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: chíigangʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: chíigangʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: chíigangʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Res: chíigangʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼus
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: chíigangʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: chíigangʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: chíigangʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: chíigangʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: chíigangʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: chíigangʼangʼwaaʼahl
     chíigang+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: chíigangʼangʼwaaäseehl
